Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-652
Violations; penalties; enforcement; venue.

(1) Except when another penalty is specifically provided, any person or licensee, or employee or agent thereof, who knowingly or intentionally violates any provision of the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, or who causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to cause any person or licensee or any employee or agent thereof to violate the act, shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class IV felony for any second or subsequent violation. Any licensee guilty of violating the act more than once in a twelve-month period may have its license canceled or revoked.

(2) Each of the following violations of the act shall be a Class IV felony:

(a) Giving, providing, or offering to give or provide, directly or indirectly, to any public official, employee, or agent of this state or any agencies or political subdivisions of this state any compensation or reward or share of the money for property paid or received through gambling activities regulated under the act in consideration for obtaining any license, authorization, permission, or privilege to participate in any gaming operations except as authorized under the act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act;

(b) Intentionally employing or possessing any device to facilitate cheating in any lottery or using any fraudulent scheme or technique in connection with any lottery when the amount gained or intended to be gained through the use of such device, scheme, or technique is three hundred dollars or more;

(c) Knowingly filing a false report under the act; or

(d) Knowingly falsifying or making any false entry in any books or records with respect to any transaction connected with the conduct of a lottery.

(3) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or appropriate county attorney to prosecute and defend all proceedings initiated in any court or otherwise under the act.

(4) The failure to do any act required by or under the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act shall be deemed an act in part in the principal office of the department. Any prosecution under such act may be conducted in any county where the defendant resides or has a place of business or in any county in which any violation occurred.

(5) In the enforcement and investigation of any offense committed under the act, the department may call to its aid any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other peace officer in the state.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 92;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 21;

Laws 1995, LB 344, § 33;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 34.